Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8365.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 106
INTERNATIONAL PUBLIC HEALTH COLLABORATION
23-106-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Department” means the Rhode Island department of health.
(2) “Global outbreak response network” means an international collaboration of public
health institutions coordinated by the World Health Organization or similar international public
health authority for the purpose of disease surveillance and outbreak response.
(3) “Public health collaboration agreement” means an agreement between the department
and a national or international public health entity to share expertise, training, surveillance
information, or technical assistance related to infectious disease response.
23-106-2. Authority of the department.
The department is authorized to:
(1) Participate in international public-health collaboration network including, but not
limited, to the Global Outbreak Alert and Response Network (“GOARN”).
(2) Enter into public-health collaboration agreements with federal agencies, international

organizations, academic institutions, and public-health authorities.
(3) Designate a state public-health office, department of health laboratory, or program as
the institutional partner representing the state in such networks.
(4) Participate in training programs, data-sharing initiatives, and technical assistance
programs related to outbreak detection and response.
(5) Provide voluntary deployment of qualified public-health personnel where possible to
assist in outbreak investigations or response efforts coordinated through such networks.
23-106-3. Privacy and legal protections.
Participation authorized under this chapter shall:
(1) Comply with all applicable federal and state privacy laws.
(2) Protect individually identifiable health information consistent with the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (“HIPAA”) and state public health confidentiality
statutes.
(3) Not transfer regulatory or policymaking authority of the state to any international
organization.
23-106-4. Coordination with federal authorities.
The department shall coordinate participation in international public-health collaboration
networks with relevant agencies, including the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, when
appropriate.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006207/SUB A
========
LC006207/SUB A - Page 2 of 3